North Dakota, session 69, HB1221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - STATE BOARD OF HIGHER EDUCTION -
WORKFORCE EDUCATION INNOVATION PROGRAM. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$24,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the state board of higher
education for the purpose of awarding workforce education innovation funds to eligible
institutions, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 1 25.0802.01000